Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-205
Secretary of State; office hours on election day.

The office of the Secretary of State shall be open and available to any election commissioner, county clerk, city or village clerk, and their employees on each primary and general election day during the hours the polls are open for voting.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 25.